New Jersey, session 221, S934.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a person may display an American flag on a bridge or overpass that travels over property of the New Jersey Turnpike Authority, provided that the person receives permission from the authority through a permit process established by the authority and the flag is properly maintained by the person and displayed in a manner consistent with the rules and customs deemed the proper manner to display the flag, such as the federal flag code, 4 U.S.C. s.1 et seq., or any other applicable law or guideline.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, the New Jersey Turnpike Authority shall not remove any American flag that is displayed in accordance with this section. 2.    Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a person may display an American flag on a bridge or overpass that travels over property of the South Jersey Transportation Authority, provided that the person receives permission from the authority through a permit process established by the authority and the flag is properly maintained by the person and displayed in a manner consistent with the rules and customs deemed the proper manner to display the flag, such as the federal flag code, 4 U.S.C. s.1 et seq., or any other applicable law or guideline.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, the South Jersey Transportation Authority shall not remove any American flag that is displayed in accordance with this section. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.